Massachusetts, session 194th, H628.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The third paragraph of section 1D of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following
sentence:- The standards shall provide for instruction in: (i) tribal history and current issues of
the Aquinnah Wampanoag, Mashpee Wampanoag and other Wampanoag tribes, the
Massachuset, the Nipmuc and other Native American tribes that exist within Massachusetts; (ii)
information about tribes and confederacies that have historic ties to Massachusetts, such as the
Wabanaki Confederacy; (iii) tribal history of Native Americans throughout the United States;
(iv) tribal sovereignty and governance, treaty rights, genocide, Native American cultures,
languages and socioeconomic experiences; and (v) ongoing issues common to contemporary
Native Americans throughout Massachusetts; provided, that to develop these standards the board
of 2

shall consult consistently with the special relationship between the Commonwealth and Native
Americans as molded by Treaty and Agreement, Legislative Act and Executive Order.
of 2